apertium-niv.niv.lexd
# Multichar_Symbols

# ! Part of speech categories
# <n>   ! Noun
# <v>   ! Verb
# <adv> ! Adverb
# <cnjadv> ! Conjunctive adverb
# <prn> ! Pronoun
# <num> ! Numeral
# !<enc> ! Enclitic
# <det> ! Determiner
# <part> ! Particle
# <ij> ! Interjection

# ! Case categories
# <nom> ! Nominative
# <age> ! Agentive
# <dat> ! Dative
# <ins> ! Instrumental
# <loc> ! Locative
# <abl> ! Ablative
# <term> ! Terminative
# <comp> ! Comparative
# <voc> ! Vocative

# ! Pronoun categories
# <pers> ! Personal
# <dem> ! Demonstrative
# <indef> ! Indefinite
# <itg> ! Interrogative
# <ref> ! Reflexive

# ! Person categories
# <p1> ! First person
# <p2> ! Second person
# <p3> ! Third person

# ! Number categories
# <sg> ! Singular
# <du> ! Dual
# <pl> ! Plural

# ! Clusivity categories
# <incl> ! Inclusive
# <excl> ! Exclusive

# ! Verb categories
# <tv> ! Transitive verb
# <iv> ! Intransitive verb

# ! Verb forms
# <inf> ! infinitive
# <cvb_nar1> ! narrative converb (null suffix)
# <cvb_nar2> ! narrative converb (-data/-durngu)
# <cvb_ant> ! anterior/simultaneous converb
# <cvb_cond> ! conditional converb ("if")
# <nmz_pred> ! Predicate-actant nominalisation
# <nmz_subj> ! Subject nominalisation
# <nmz_loc> ! Locative nominalisation
# <nmz_adv> ! Adverbial nominalisation
# <perm> ! permanent property (for certain attributive verbs)

# ! Mood categories (for now)
# <ind> ! Indicative
# <pot> ! Potential
# ! <imp> ! Imperative
# <itg> ! Interrogative
# <itg_pej> ! pejorative interrogative

# ! Evidentiality / stuff
# ! may matter later

# ! Tense categories
# <fut> ! Future

# ! Noun categories
# <np> Proper noun

# ! Numeral classes
# <cl1>
# <cl2>
# <cl3>
# <cl4>
# <cl5>
# <cl6>
# <cl7>
# <cl8>
# <cl9>

# ! Formality categories
# <frm> ! Formal
# <infrm> ! Informal

# ! Noun Attribute
# <attr> ! Noun attribute

# ! Other symbols
# ! <redup> ! Reduplication
# <qst>
# <foc>
# <emph>
# <poss>
# >      ! Morpheme boundary

# ! Punctuation tags
# <sent>      ! Sentence marker
# <guio>      ! Hyphen
# <cm>        ! Comma
# <apos>      ! Apostrophe
# <rquot>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
# <lquot>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
# <rpar>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
# <lpar>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

# %[Verb%]      ! verb for twoc
# %[Noun%]      ! noun for twoc



#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot-Amur   # SOME OF THESE MAY BE WORDS IN SAKH AS WELL. Those labelled with '! Amur' are NOT.
умгу:умгу           # woman         ! Amur
ытык:ытык           # father
ӄан:ӄан             # doggo         ! Amur
ӈа:ӈа               # animal
тыф:ты{ф}           # house         ! Amur
ми:ми               # inside
нивх:нивх{ӈ}        # person        ! Amur
ваӄа:ваӄа           # box, trunk, chest
сета:сета           # sugar
ойдам:ойдам         # baby          ! Amur
курӈ:курӈ           # universe
тяӄо:{Ч}{ь}аӄо      # knife
оғла:оғла           # child         ! Amur
оола:оола           # Dir/LR         ! Amur
чатьф:чатьф         # bog, swamp
ыф:ы{ф}             # beard         ! Amur
арф:ар{ф}           # side of boat
му:му               # boat
ӿуньф:ӿунь{ф}       # barrel
пердь:пердь         # burden
ыкын:ыкын           # older brother
атик:атик           # younger brother
нанак:нанак         # older sister
ытик:ытик           # grandmother
пос:пос             # fabric, cloth
ӈафӄ:ӈафӄ           # friend
леп:леп             # bread
лар̌ӄ:лар̌ӄ           # shirt, dress, gown
кинс:кинс           # devil
во:во               # village
кʼеӄ:к{ʼ}еӄ         # fox
чеврӄ:чеврӄ         # bird
тупр̌:тупр̌           # feather
тюс:{Ч}{ь}ус        # meat
мулк:мулк           # basket
ӈояӄ:ӈояӄ           # egg
ӄʼас:ӄ{ʼ}ас         # tambourine
выйбукс:выйбукс     # tie
мифпʼидь:мифпʼидь   # toad
ӄʼос:ӄ{ʼ}ос         # neck
коӽ:коӽ             # belly
пыньх:пыньх         # soup
нё:нё               # barn
ӿеӄрӈа:ӿеӄрӈа       # place further from shore (than here)
лумр̌:лумр̌           # sable
ӿонтӄ:ӿонтӄ         # sack
ӿемар:ӿемар         # old man         ! Amur
паӽ:паӽ             # stone, rock
толф:тол{ф}         # summer
ма:ма               # dried fish
питғы:питғы         # paper (written), book
пон:пон             # villager
кʼеӈ:к{ʼ}еӈ         # sun
ӈыньк:ӈыньк 	      # face
ӈайн:ӈайн 	        # cheek
тʼыр:т{ʼ}ыр         # left (not right)   ! TEST - bad: no change after ч
ӈир:ӈир 	          # right (not left)
ӈамадь:ӈамадь       # skin
няӽ:няӽ 	          # eye
них:них 	          # tear (from eye)
тʼадм:т{ʼ}адм 	    # pate, crown of head        ! see def. in Sakhalin section
тʼа:т{ʼ}а 	        # pate, crown of head
ӿеғми:ӿеғми 	      # temple (of head)
нос:нос 	          # ear
мла:мла 	          # earlobe          ! means 'ear' in Sakhalin
вих:вих 	          # nose
ньхыр:ньхыр 	      # eyebrow
ыӈг:ыӈг 	          # mouth            ! Amur
ӈығс:ӈығс 	        # tooth            ! Amur
эмс:эмс 	          # molar            ! means 'tooth' in Sakhalin
ӈыньф:ӈынь{ф} 	    # bone             ! Amur
ывлх:ывлх 	        # lip              ! Amur
ити:ити 	          # chin             ! Amur
оӻри:оӻри 	        # nape, occiput
тʼуур:т{ʼ}уур       # fire
кʼуты:к{ʼ}уты       # hole
керӄ:керӄ           # sea
пʼирӈыр:п{ʼ}ирӈыр   # sazan (kind of carp)
теӈи:теӈи           # pink salmon      ! {Ч}{ь}?
ыс:ыс               # owner            ! Amur
лаӈр̌:лаӈр̌           # seal
ӿыйк:ӿыйк           # hare
пых:пых             # cuckoo
топин:топин         # jay
тʼом:т{ʼ}ом         # fat
мур:мур             # horse            ! Amur
чо:чо               # fish
чӽа:чӽа             # money
кʼнык:кʼнык         # promontory
ымык:ымык           # mother
ӄʼах:ӄ{ʼ}ах         # spear
тавӻай:тавӻай        # crab
вынь:вынь           # kettle
туӈ:туӈ             # sea lion
тойғур:тойғур       # seal            ! not in Taksami's dictionary
чуғных:чуғных       # walrus
ыс:ыс               # swallow (bird)
ат:ат               # tiger
кетул:кетул         # giraffe
кʼузр:к{ʼ}узр       # wolverine
лаӄр:лаӄр           # squirrel
воӈи:воӈи           # musk deer
меӄ:меӄ             # musk deer
лиғс:лиғс           # wolf
лиғзнонӄ:лиғзнонӄ   # wolf cub
мем:мем             # monkey
обезьяна:обезьяна   # monkey
ӄʼотр:ӄ{ʼ}отр       # bear        ! Amur
мок:мок             # bear        ! not in dictionaries
чхыф:чхы{ф}         # bear
тотр:тотр           # marten
тʼоӽ:т{ʼ}оӽ         # moose
тʼорӄ:т{ʼ}орӄ       # badger
члығи:члығи         # lynx        ! тлығи? тʼлығи?
тʼлаӈи:т{ʼ}лаӈи     # (rein)deer
ӈы:ӈы               # otter
чоӽ:чоӽ             # fang, tusk
нитьф:нить{ф}       # target
ӈаӻр:ӈаӻр           # skin, coat, pelt
тиф:ти{ф}           # track, print, footprint
авсӄ:авсӄ           # ruff, ruffe (fish)
ва:ва               # predatory carp; redfin culter; Chanodichthys erythropterus
вағс:вағс           # whitefish
тёмр:{Ч}{ь}омр      # grass; leaf
визлых:визлых       # root
титӈыр:титӈыр       # thorn
р̌авӈыкс:р̌{ʼ}авӈыкс  # rhododendron
кʼмый:к{ʼ}мый       # oak
ӿим:ӿим             # Siberian dwarf pine
ӈарӈи:ӈарӈи         # fir
теуӈи:теуӈи         # Dir/LR                     ! {Ч}{ь}?
тевӻай:тевӻай       # maple (tree)                ! {Ч}{ь}?
ӿивс:ӿивс           # birch
мускыр:мускыр       # poplar
ӄаӻӈ:ӄаӻӈ           # pine
тыкнь:тыкнь        # fingernail, toenail, claw, talon
олӽ:олӽ             # cane, rush, reed
музӈи:музӈи         # sedge
воӻдёӈр:воӻдёӈр     # hummock, hillock, mound
мер:мер             # pussy willow
оӻм:оӻм             # bark
ваӽ:ваӽ             # moss, lichen
вах:вах             # handle
аньӽ:аньӽ           # female (animal?)
ар:ар               # male (animal?)
ӈайӄ:ӈайӄ           # puppy
найӄнонӄ:найӄнонӄ   # Dir/LR
кʼыск:к{ʼ}ыск       # cat (female)
архыск:архыск       # cat (male)            ! Can be generated by transducer
олӻоӈ:олӻоӈ          # pig, hog, boar
олоӈ:олоӈ           # Dir/LR
эӻа:эӻа              # cow
арэӻа:арэӻа          # bull, ox              ! Can be generated by transducer
армур:армур         # stallion              ! Can be generated by transducer
чӈыр:чӈыр           # hay
мус:мус             # oats
ӄʼорӽ:ӄ{ʼ}орӽ       # blockhead, dimwit, dunce, idiot
чылғи:чылғи         # foot                  ! not in dictionary
чылм:чылм           # palm
ӈытьх:ӈытьх         # leg
ӈызл:ӈызл           # foot; sole
ынғи:ынғи           # heel                  ! Amur
пих:пих             # knee                  ! Amur
ӈаф:ӈа{ф}           # thigh                 ! Amur
ӈиф:ӈи{ф}           # heart
хых:хых             # calf (of leg)
кезӈи:кезӈи         # gland
микрвыкрук:микрвыкрук  # kidneys            ! not in dictionary
тʼыус:т{ʼ}ыус       # kidney
ӈызрк:ӈызрк         # vein                  ! Amur
сусыр:сусыр         # spleen
тʼвирк:т{ʼ}вирк     # bile
чылу:чылу           # fog
лах:лах             # cloud
тʼлы:т{ʼ}лы         # sky
миф:ми{ф}           # earth
орми:орми           # clay
маӽ:маӽ             # sand
эри:эри             # river
пал:пал             # mountain
пал:пал             # taiga
пот:пот             # knoll, hill, mound
ӈыю:ӈыю             # ravine
ӈалу:ӈалу           # bay
ки:ки               # footwear
ӄʼоӻа:ӄ{ʼ}оӻа       # nature
утку:утку           # husband
нёни:нёни           # goose
